Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,330
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act.

Laws 2025, LB36, § 17.